Maryland, session 2026, HB0894.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 5–709 of Article – Economic Development of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 5–710.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
5–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Enterprise zone” means an area:
(1) that meets the requirements of § 5–704(a) of this subtitle and is
designated as an enterprise zone by the Secretary under § 5–704(b) of this subtitle;
(2) (I) DESIGNATED AS A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT
UNDER § 7–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(II) THAT IS SERVED BY A RAIL TRANSIT STATION THAT
RECEIVES AT LEAST HOURLY SERVICE ON AVERAGE FROM 8:00 A.M. UNTIL 6:00 P.M.
MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY; AND
(III) DESIGNATED AS AN ENTERPRISE ZONE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 5–709 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
[(2)] (3) designated as an enterprise zone by the United States
government under 42 U.S.C. §§ 11501 through 11505; or
[(3)] (4) designated as an empowerment zone or enterprise community by
the United States government under 26 U.S.C. §§ 1391 through 1397F.
5–707.

HOUSE BILL 894
(e) (1) (i) Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, except for a
business entity certified to receive a property tax credit under § 9–103 of the Tax – Property
Article for a tax year beginning before July 1, 2008, a business entity located in an
enterprise zone may not receive the incentives and initiatives set forth in subsection (a)(1)
and (2) of this section if the entity is located on land or within improvements owned by the
federal government, the State, a county, or a municipal corporation unless the business
entity has first utilized all applicable property tax exemptions under Title 7 of the
Tax – Property Article, including entering into any available payment in lieu of tax
agreement.
(ii) Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph does not apply to a business
entity leasing land or improvements owned by the Maryland Economic Development
Corporation OR THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.
5–709.
(A) (1) AN SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN AREA
DESIGNATED AS A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT UNDER § 7–101 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THAT IS SERVED BY A RAIL
TRANSIT STATION THAT RECEIVES AT LEAST HOURLY SERVICE ON AVERAGE FROM
8:00 A.M. UNTIL 6:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY SHALL IS ELIGIBLE TO
AUTOMATICALLY BE DESIGNATED AS AN ENTERPRISE ZONE UNDER THE PROVISIONS
OF THIS SUBTITLE NOTWITHSTANDING THE LIMIT ON THE NUMBER OF ENTERPRISE
ZONES THAT THE SECRETARY MAY DESIGNATE UNDER § 5–704(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR MULTICOUNTY AGENCY WITH LAND
USE AND PLANNING RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE AREA THAT REQUESTED THE AREA
BE DESIGNATED AS A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT MAY ELECT, BY
ORDINANCE, RESOLUTION, OR SIMILAR ACTION, TO DESIGNATE THE AREA AS AN
ENTERPRISE ZONE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN AREA
DESIGNATED AS A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT UNDER § 7–101 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026, THAT IS SERVED BY A
RAIL TRANSIT STATION THAT RECEIVES AT LEAST HOURLY SERVICE ON AVERAGE
FROM 8:00 A.M. UNTIL 6:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY SHALL
AUTOMATICALLY BE DESIGNATED AS AN ENTERPRISE ZONE NOTWITHSTANDING THE
LIMIT ON THE NUMBER OF ENTERPRISE ZONES THAT THE SECRETARY MAY
DESIGNATE UNDER § 5–704(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) (I) AT THE TIME A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT AREA IS
DESIGNATED, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR MULTICOUNTY AGENCY WITH LAND USE
AND PLANNING RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE AREA THAT REQUESTED THE AREA BE

HOUSE BILL 894 5
DESIGNATED AS A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT MAY ELECT NOT TO
DESIGNATE THE AREA AS AN ENTERPRISE ZONE.
(II) AN ELECTION MADE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE DONE, IN WRITING, TO THE SUSTAINABLE GROWTH
SUBCABINET ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1403 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
10–134.
(b) (1) There is a Strategic Infrastructure Revolving Loan Program in the
Maryland Economic Development Corporation.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to make loans for targeted investments
in real estate and infrastructure projects to support transformative place–making, enhance
transit–oriented development, enhance community development, and achieve inclusive and
equitable economic growth objectives, with a focus on bringing underutilized assets into
performance and generating revenue.
(d) (1) An applicant for a loan under this section shall submit to the
Corporation an application on the form that the Corporation requires.
(2) The application shall include:
(i) a detailed strategic plan for the targeted investment;
(ii) the amount of money required for the activities described in the
strategic plan;
(iii) the money available to the applicant without financial assistance
from the Program;
(iv) the amount of financial assistance requested from the Program;
(v) information relating to the financial status of the applicant,
including, if applicable:
1. a current balance sheet;
2. a profit and loss statement; and
3. credit references; and
(vi) any other relevant information that the Corporation requests.

HOUSE BILL 894
(3) An applicant is eligible for a loan under the Program for projects located
in a sustainable community, priority funding area, or transit–oriented development area.
(4) The Corporation shall establish an Advisory Loan Committee to review
loan applications and make recommendations to the Corporation on approval.
(5) In making loans, the Corporation shall prioritize projects that:
(i) activate underutilized property owned by the government and
institutions;
(ii) REDEVELOP STATE–OWNED LAND CONTIGUOUS TO RAIL
TRANSIT STATIONS THAT IS OWNED BY THE STATE, BALTIMORE CITY, OR THE
WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY;
(III) offer significant development or redevelopment value;
[(iii)] (IV) leverage private investment; and
[(iv)] (V) have the potential for significant job growth or retention.
(6) Loans may be used:
(i) to acquire property, including vacant sites;
(ii) for design and development of a project; and
(iii) for rehabilitation, construction, and demolition.
Article – Land Use
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (1) “Legislative body” means the elected body of a local jurisdiction.
(2) “Legislative body” includes:
(i) the board of county commissioners;
(ii) the county council; and
(iii) the governing body of a municipal corporation.
1–401.

HOUSE BILL 894 7
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(1) this subtitle, including Parts II and III (Charter county –
Comprehensive plans);
(2) § 1–101(l), (m), and (o) (Definitions – “Plan”, “Priority funding area”,
and “Sensitive area”);
(3) § 1–201 (Visions);
(4) § 1–206 (Required education);
(5) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(6) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(7) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 5 (Growth Tiers);
(9) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – [Bicycle parking)] PARKING);
(10) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(11) § 4–104(E) (LIMITATIONS – MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT);
(12) § 4–104(F) (LIMITATIONS – STATE–OWNED LAND LAND FOR
TRANSPORTATION USE);
[(11)] (13) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
[(12)] (14) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
[(13)] (15) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating
systems);
[(14)] (16) § 4–212 (Agritourism);
[(15)] (17) § 4–213 (Alcohol production);
[(16)] (18) § 4–214 (Agricultural alcohol production);
[(17)] (19) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);

HOUSE BILL 894
[(18)] (20) § 4–216 (Limitations – Family child care homes and large family
child care homes);
[(19)] (21) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
[(20)] (22) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(21)] (23) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
[(22)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(23)] (25) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(24)] (26) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title
7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
[(25)] (27) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(26)] (28) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
[(27)] (29) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
[(28)] (30) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);
[(29)] (31) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
[(30)] (32) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
[(31)] (33) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); and
[(32)] (34) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
4–104.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ADEQUATE PARKING STUDY” MEANS A DATA–SUPPORTED
ANALYSIS PREPARED FOR A DEVELOPMENT BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION TO
EVALUATE WHETHER ONE OR MORE PARKING REQUIREMENTS, PARKING RATIOS, OR

HOUSE BILL 894 9
PARKING MANAGEMENT STANDARDS POTENTIALLY IMPOSED ON A DEVELOPMENT
ARE JUSTIFIED TO ADDRESS LOCAL PARKING ISSUES.
(2) (3) “MIXED–USE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–501 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(3) (4) [In this section, “modular] “MODULAR dwelling” means a
building assembly or system of building subassemblies designed for habitation as a
dwelling for one or more individuals:
[(1)] (I) that includes the necessary electrical, plumbing, heating,
ventilating, and other service systems;
[(2)] (II) that is made or assembled by a manufacturer on or off the
building site for installation, or assembly and installation, on the building site; and
[(3)] (III) installed and set up according to the manufacturer’s instructions
on an approved foundation and support system.
(b) (1) The powers granted to a local jurisdiction under this subtitle do not:
[(1)] (I) grant the local jurisdiction powers in any substantive area not
otherwise granted to the local jurisdiction by any other public general or public local law;
[(2)] (II) restrict the local jurisdiction from exercising any power granted
to the local jurisdiction by any other public general or public local law or otherwise;
[(3)] (III) authorize the local jurisdiction or its officers to engage in any
activity that is beyond their power under any other public general or public local law or
otherwise; or
[(4)] (IV) preempt or supersede the regulatory authority of any unit of the
State under any public general law.
(2) SUBSECTIONS (C)(2) AND (E) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY TO:
(I) A RAIL STATION LOCATED ON THE CAMPUS OF AN
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE; OR
(II) PROPERTY THAT:
1. IS PARTIALLY LOCATED OUTSIDE:

HOUSE BILL 894
A. FOR THE PROVISIONS IN SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS
SECTION, 0.25 MILES OF THE RAIL TRANSIT STATION; OR
B. FOR THE PROVISIONS IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, 0.5 MILES OF THE RAIL TRANSIT STATION; OR
2. IS IN AN AREA THAT WAS ZONED FOR SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENTIAL USE ON JANUARY 1, 2026.
(c) (1) (I) If a legislative body regulates off–street parking, the legislative
body shall require space for the parking of bicycles in a manner that the legislative body
considers appropriate.
[(2)] (II) A legislative body may allow a reduction in the number of
required automobile parking spaces based on the availability of space for parking bicycles.
(2) A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
A LEGISLATIVE BODY OR OTHER LOCAL AGENCY WITH LAND USE AUTHORITY MAY
NOT IMPOSE A MINIMUM OFF–STREET PARKING REQUIREMENT ON A RESIDENTIAL
OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN 0.25 MILES OF A RAIL
TRANSIT STATION THAT RECEIVES AT LEAST HOURLY SERVICE ON AVERAGE FROM
8:00 A.M. UNTIL 6:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY.
(3) (I) A LEGISLATIVE BODY OR OTHER LOCAL AGENCY WITH LAND
USE AUTHORITY MAY IMPOSE A MINIMUM OFF–STREET PARKING REQUIREMENT ON
A RESIDENTIAL OR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT THAT IS LOCATED WITHIN 0.25 MILES
OF A RAIL TRANSIT STATION THAT RECEIVES AT LEAST HOURLY SERVICE ON
AVERAGE FROM 8:00 A.M. UNTIL 6:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY IF:
(I) 1. THE LEGISLATIVE BODY OR OTHER LOCAL AGENCY
HAS PERFORMED AN ADEQUATE PARKING STUDY WITHIN THE 3 YEARS PRIOR TO
THE SUBMISSION OF A DEVELOPMENT APPLICATION; AND
(II) 2. THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
CONCURRED IN THE FINDINGS OF THE PARKING STUDY.
(II) 1. THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL
PROVIDE ITS DECISION ON THE FINDINGS OF THE ADEQUATE PARKING STUDY
WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER THE FINDINGS ARE SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT.
2. FAILURE TO PROVIDE A DECISION WITHIN 45 DAYS
SHALL BE DEEMED AS THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION CONCURRING WITH
THE FINDINGS OF THE ADEQUATE PARKING STUDY.

HOUSE BILL 894 11
(d) A legislative body may not prohibit the placement of a new manufactured
home or modular dwelling in a zone that allows single–family residential uses if the home
or dwelling:
(1) (i) meets the definition of modular dwelling under subsection (a) of
this section; or
(ii) meets the definition of a manufactured home in § 9–102(a) of the
Commercial Law Article and is, or will be after purchase, converted to real property in
accordance with Title 8B, Subtitle 2 of the Real Property Article; or
(2) is located on land:
(i) currently or previously owned by the federal government;
(ii) greater than 80 acres in size; and
(iii) that was the site of a former U.S. military reservation.
(E) A LOCAL JURISDICTION’S ZONING REGULATIONS SHALL ALLOW
MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT ON LAND DESIGNATED FOR RESIDENTIAL USE OR
APPROPRIATE COMMERCIAL USE FOR MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT WITHIN 0.5 MILES
OF A RAIL TRANSIT STATION THAT RECEIVES AT LEAST HOURLY SERVICE ON
AVERAGE FROM 8:00 A.M. UNTIL 6:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY.
(F) FOR STATE–OWNED LAND THAT IS OWNED BY THE STATE, BALTIMORE
CITY, OR THE WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY THAT IS
IN USE FOR A TRANSPORTATION PURPOSE CONTIGUOUS TO A RAIL TRANSIT STATION
THAT RECEIVES AT LEAST HOURLY SERVICE ON AVERAGE FROM 8:00 A.M. UNTIL
6:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH FRIDAY, A LEGISLATIVE BODY OR OTHER LOCAL
AGENCY WITH LAND USE AUTHORITY MAY NOT IMPOSE LIMITATIONS OR
RESTRICTIONS ON LAND USE CLASSIFICATION, HEIGHT, OR SETBACK, OR ANY
SIMILAR REQUIREMENTS IF THE LAND IS SUBJECT TO A TRANSIT–ORIENTED
DEVELOPMENT PLAN APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND
DEVELOPED IN COORDINATION WITH THE LOCAL JURISDICTION.
(G) SUBSECTIONS (E) AND (F) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO
ALTER THE LAND USE AUTHORITY OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION GOVERNING:
(1) ENVIRONMENTAL OR NATURAL RESOURCES CONCERNS;
(2) PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY CONSIDERATIONS; OR
(3) ADEQUATE PUBLIC FACILITIES ORDINANCES.

HOUSE BILL 894
7–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (1) “Mixed–use” means any combination of a residential use with a
recreational, office, dining, or retail use.
(2) “Mixed–use” does not mean any combination of a residential use with
an industrial or hazardous use.
10–103.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(1) this title;
(2) § 1–101(m) (Definitions – “Priority funding area”);
(3) § 1–101(o) (Definitions – “Sensitive area”);
(4) § 1–201 (Visions);
(5) § 1–206 (Required education);
(6) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(7) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(9) Title 1, Subtitle 4, Parts II and III (Home Rule Counties –
Comprehensive Plans; Implementation);
(10) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – [Bicycle parking)] PARKING);
(11) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(12) § 4–104(E) (LIMITATIONS – MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT);
(13) § 4–104(F) (LIMITATIONS – STATE–OWNED LAND LAND FOR
TRANSPORTATION USE);
[(12)] (14) § 4–205 (Administrative adjustments);
[(13)] (15) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);

HOUSE BILL 894 13
[(14)] (16) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
[(15)] (17) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating
systems);
[(16)] (18) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
[(17)] (19) § 4–216 (Limitations – Family child care homes and large family
child care homes);
[(18)] (20) Title 4, Subtitle 5 (Accessory Dwelling Units);
[(19)] (21) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(20)] (22) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(21)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(22)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities
Agreements);
[(23)] (25) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(24)] (26) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability); and
[(25)] (27) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
Article – Local Government
20–128.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX” MEANS AN EXCISE TAX IMPOSED BY
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY ON THE CONSTRUCTION OR IMPROVEMENT OF A
BUILDING.
(3) “DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE” MEANS A FEE IMPOSED BY A
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF FINANCING ANY OF THE CAPITAL
COSTS OF ADDITIONAL OR EXPANDED PUBLIC WORKS, IMPROVEMENTS, AND
FACILITIES REQUIRED TO ACCOMMODATE NEW CONSTRUCTION OR DEVELOPMENT.

HOUSE BILL 894
(4) “QUALIFYING RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT” MEANS A
MIXED–USE DEVELOPMENT THAT:
(I) INCLUDES RESIDENTIAL UNITS; AND
(II) IS LOCATED WITHIN A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT
DESIGNATED UNDER § 7–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, WHERE THE
DEVELOPMENT IS SERVED BY A RAIL TRANSIT STATION THAT RECEIVES AT LEAST
HOURLY SERVICE ON AVERAGE FROM 8:00 A.M. UNTIL 6:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH
FRIDAY.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) A COUNTY THAT:
(I) IS A CHARTER COUNTY THAT IMPOSES, BY LAW,
DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES;
(II) IS A CODE COUNTY WITH PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS THAT
REQUIRE THE PAYMENT OF DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR
DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES; OR
(III) IS A COMMISSION COUNTY THAT:
1. HAS BEEN AUTHORIZED TO ENACT DEVELOPMENT
IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES; AND
2. HAS ENACTED, BY LOCAL LAW, DEVELOPMENT
IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES; AND
(2) A MUNICIPALITY THAT IMPOSES, BY LOCAL LAW, DEVELOPMENT
IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES.
(C) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR
DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE IMPOSED FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUNDING THE
CONSTRUCTION OF A CONNECTION TO A PUBLIC WATER OR SEWER SYSTEM.
(D) ANY DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE
IMPOSED ON A QUALIFYING RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT UNDER THE
AUTHORITY GRANTED IN THIS ARTICLE MAY NOT BE COLLECTED UNTIL AFTER:
(1) CONSTRUCTION OF THE QUALIFYING RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE
PROJECT IS COMPLETE; AND

HOUSE BILL 894 15
(2) A CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, AN OCCUPANCY PERMIT, OR ANY
OTHER LOCAL EQUIVALENT HAS BEEN ISSUED FOR THE QUALIFYING RESIDENTIAL
REAL ESTATE PROJECT.
(E) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY
THAT IMPOSES A DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE ON A
QUALIFYING RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT UNDER THE AUTHORITY
GRANTED IN THIS ARTICLE MAY REVOKE A CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, AN
OCCUPANCY PERMIT, OR ANY OTHER LOCAL EQUIVALENT IF THE DEVELOPMENT
EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE IS NOT PAID WITHIN A REASONABLE
TIME PERIOD SET BY THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY.
Article – Transportation
7–1204.
(b) (2) The Sustainable Growth Subcabinet established under §
9–1406 of the State Government Article may establish:
(i) Different eligibility requirements and objective scoring
standards for different types of financial assistance; and
(ii) Scoring preferences for applications that demonstrate that the
proposed project will:
1. Enhance access to transit for low–income and minority
residents of the local jurisdiction;
2. Enhance access to transit in areas with affordable housing
and a diversity of job and educational opportunities; [or]
3. Encourage development around underdeveloped and
underutilized transit stations in transit–oriented developments; OR
4. USE PROJECT LABOR AGREEMENTS.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Local Government
20–128.

HOUSE BILL 894
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX” MEANS AN EXCISE TAX IMPOSED BY
A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY ON THE CONSTRUCTION OR IMPROVEMENT OF A
BUILDING.
(3) “DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE” MEANS A FEE IMPOSED BY A
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF FINANCING ANY OF THE CAPITAL
COSTS OF ADDITIONAL OR EXPANDED PUBLIC WORKS, IMPROVEMENTS, AND
FACILITIES REQUIRED TO ACCOMMODATE NEW CONSTRUCTION OR DEVELOPMENT.
(4) “RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT” MEANS A MIXED–USE
DEVELOPMENT THAT:
(I) INCLUDES RESIDENTIAL UNITS; AND
(II) IS LOCATED WITHIN A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT
DESIGNATED UNDER § 7–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, WHERE THE
DEVELOPMENT IS SERVED BY A RAIL TRANSIT STATION THAT RECEIVES AT LEAST
HOURLY SERVICE ON AVERAGE FROM 8:00 A.M. UNTIL 6:00 P.M. MONDAY THROUGH
FRIDAY.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) A COUNTY THAT:
(I) IS A CHARTER COUNTY THAT IMPOSES, BY LAW,
DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES;
(II) IS A CODE COUNTY WITH PUBLIC LOCAL LAWS THAT
REQUIRE THE PAYMENT OF DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR
DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES; OR
(III) IS A COMMISSION COUNTY THAT:
1. HAS BEEN AUTHORIZED TO ENACT DEVELOPMENT
IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES; AND
2. HAS ENACTED, BY LOCAL LAW, DEVELOPMENT
IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES; AND
(2) A MUNICIPALITY THAT IMPOSES, BY LOCAL LAW, DEVELOPMENT
IMPACT FEES, SURCHARGES, OR DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAXES.

HOUSE BILL 894 17
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ANY DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE
IMPOSED ON A RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT UNDER THE AUTHORITY
GRANTED IN THIS ARTICLE MAY NOT BE COLLECTED UNTIL AFTER:
(I) CONSTRUCTION OF THE RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE
PROJECT IS COMPLETE; AND
(II) ALL REQUIREMENTS FOR A CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY,
AN OCCUPANCY PERMIT, OR ANY OTHER LOCAL EQUIVALENT THAT HAS BEEN
ISSUED FOR THE RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT HAVE BEEN MET.
(2) A DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE
IMPOSED ON A RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT UNDER THE AUTHORITY
GRANTED IN THIS ARTICLE MAY BE COLLECTED AS A PRECONDITION TO
CONDUCTING A FINAL INSPECTION OF THE PROJECT, BUT NOT MORE THAN 30 DAYS
BEFORE PRIOR TO THE DATE OF THE INSPECTION.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE COLLECTION OF A
DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE THAT WAS IMPOSED ON
A RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT TO FINANCE A COUNTY DEBT THAT WAS
INCURRED ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY
THAT IMPOSES A DEVELOPMENT EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE ON A
RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE PROJECT UNDER THE AUTHORITY GRANTED IN THIS
ARTICLE MAY DENY, WITHHOLD, OR REVOKE A CERTIFICATE OF OCCUPANCY, AN
OCCUPANCY PERMIT, OR ANY OTHER LOCAL EQUIVALENT IF THE DEVELOPMENT
EXCISE TAX OR DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE IS NOT PAID WITHIN A REASONABLE
TIME PERIOD SET BY THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That § 4–104(e) of the Land Use
Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act, shall apply only to land use rezonings or actions
taken by a legislative body on or after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2026, contingent on the failure of Chapter ____ (S.B. 325/H.B. 548) of the
Acts of the General Assembly of 2026, and if Chapter ____ (S.B. 325/H.B. 548) becomes
effective, Section 3 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be null and void.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That § 5–709 of the Economic
Development Article, as enacted by Section 2 of this Act, shall apply retroactively to an
area designated prior to the effective date of this Act as a transit–oriented development

HOUSE BILL 894
under § 7–101 of the Transportation Article and that is served by a rail transit station that
receives at least hourly service on average from 8:00 a.m. until 6:00 p.m. Monday through
Friday.
SECTION 5. 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.